New Jersey, session 221, A2177.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 1 of P.L.2021, c.223 (C.18A:62-65) is amended to read as follows: 1.    As used in this act: ["Cost of attendance" means cost of attendance as defined pursuant to 20 U.S.C. s.1087ll. "Expected family contribution" means expected family contribution as determined pursuant to 20 U.S.C. s.1087nn.] "Financial need" means cost of attendance [minus expected family contribution] as defined pursuant to 20 U.S.C. s.1087ll. "Institutional financial aid" means need-based and merit-based grants, scholarships, tuition waivers, and all other forms of financial assistance provided by a  public institution of higher education that are not loans or work-study programs. "Private scholarships" means scholarships awarded by businesses, private foundations, nonprofit organizations, and service groups. Private scholarships shall not include awards funded by a private organization which is affiliated with a public institution of higher education and requests the institution's assistance in selecting the recipients of scholarships. (cf: P.L.2021, c.223, s.1) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.